District of Columbia statutes.
32-1362

Discrimination based on status as unemployed unlawful.

No employer or employment agency shall:

(1)

Fail or refuse to consider for employment, or fail or refuse to hire, an individual as an employee because of the individual’s status as unemployed; or

(2)

Publish, in print, on the Internet, or in any other medium, an advertisement or announcement for any vacancy in a job for employment that includes:

(A)

Any provision stating or indicating that an individual’s status as unemployed disqualifies the individual for the job; or

(B)

Any provision stating or indicating that an employment agency will not consider or hire an individual for employment based on that individual’s status as unemployed.

History

May 31, 2012, D.C. Law 19-132, § 3, 59 DCR 2391